District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1703

Board of Barber Examiners created; composition; qualifications; term of office; removal; vacancies; officers; records; rules and regulations; annual report

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 38(a), 40 DCR 660
1981 Ed., § 2-401 to 2-419.